Utah statutes.
31A-25-402.   Notice to insureds regarding administration of policies.

(1)  If the services of a third party administrator are utilized, the third party administrator shall provide a written notice to the insureds, advising them of the identity of and relationship among the third party administrator, the policyholder, and  any insurer issuing the policy.  This notice shall be approved by the policyholder and by the insurer, if any.

(2)  If a third party administrator collects funds, the third party administrator shall identify and state separately in writing to the person paying the administrator the amount of the third party administrator's charge and the premium specified by the insurer for the insurance coverage.

